en: Belgian butters
bg: Белгийско масло
fr: Beurres belges
hr: Belgijski maslaci
lt: Belgiški sviestai

en: French butters
bg: Френско масло
fr: Beurres français
hr: Francuski maslaci
lt: Prancūziški sviestai
pt: Manteigas francesas

en: Herb butters
nl: Kruidenboters, Knoflookboters

en: Spanish butters
bg: Испанско масло
fr: Graisses espagnoles
hr: Španjolski maslaci
lt: Ispaniški sviestai
nl: Spaanse roomboters

en: Skyrs, Skyr
xx: Skyrs, Skyr
bg: Скир
ja: スキール
pl: Skyr
ru: Скир

en: Plain skyrs, Plain skyr
fr: Skyrs nature, Skyr nature
hr: Obična neba
nl: Skyrs natuur
pl: Skyr naturalny

en: Fruit skyrs, Fruit skyr
bg: Скир с плодове
fr: Skyrs aux fruits, Skyr aux fruits
hr: Voće skyrs
nl: Skyrs met vruchten
pl: Skyr owocowy

xx: Viili, Filmjölk
fi: Viili
se: Filmjölk, filbunke
sv: Filmjölk

se: Filmjölk med frukt
sv: Filmjölk med frukt

en: Quarks, quark
ar: كوارك
az: Kəsmik
be: тварог
bg: Извара
cs: tvaroh
da: Kvark
de: Quark, Weißkäse, Topfen, Schotten, Speisequark
es: Queso quark
fi: Rahka
fr: Quarks, Quark
he: גבינה לבנה
hr: Kvarkovi
hu: Túró
hy: Կաթնաշոռ
id: Quark
it: Quark
ja: クワルク
ka: ხაჭო
ko: 크바르크
lb: Stoffi
lt: Varškė, Varškės, Varškės sūriai
lv: biezpiens
nb: kvarg
nl: kwark, plattekaas
nn: kvarg
pl: Twaróg, Ser twarogowy
pt: quark
ru: творог
sh: quark
sk: Tvaroh
sv: Kvarg
tr: Kesmik
tt: эремчек
uk: домашній сир
wa: Makêye
zh: 奶渣

en: Plain quarks, Plain quark
fr: Quarks nature, Quark nature
hr: Obični kvarkovi
nl: Kwarks natuur

en: Fruit quarks, Fruit quark
fr: Quarks aux fruits, Quark aux fruits
hr: Voćni kvarkovi
nl: Kwarks met vruchten

en: Herb quarks
de: Kräuterquark
fr: Quarks aux herbes aromatiques
hr: Biljni kvarkovi
nl: Kwarks met kruiden

en: Lean quark
de: Magerquark, Quark Magerstufe
fi: Kevytrahka
fr: Quark maigre
hr: Mršavi kvark
lt: Liesos varškės, Liesa varškė
nl: Magere kwarks

en: Quark with 10% fat in dry mass
de: Viertelfettquark, Quark Viertelfettstufe, Quark 10% Fett i. Tr.
fr: Séré avec 10% de graisse en masse sèche, Quark avec 10% de graisse en masse sèche
hr: Kvark sa 10% masti u suhoj masi

en: Quark with 20% fat in dry mass
de: Halbfettquark, Quark Halbfettstufe, Quark 20% Fett i. Tr.
fr: Séré avec 20% de graisse en masse sèche, Quark avec 20% de graisse en masse sèche
hr: Kvark sa 20% masti u suhoj masi
it: Formaggio Quark con il 20% di grassi in massa secca
nl: Kwarks met 20% vetgehalte

en: Quark with 30% fat in dry mass
de: Dreiviertelfettquark, Quark Dreiviertelfettstufe, Quark 30% Fett i. Tr.

en: Creamy quark, Quark with 40% fat in dry mass
de: Quark Fettstufe, Sahnequark, Quark 40% Fett i. Tr.
fr: Quark allégé
hr: Kremasti kvark
nl: Kwarks (light)

en: Quark with 45% fat in dry mass
de: Quark Vollfettstufe, Quark 45% Fett i. Tr.

en: Quark with 50% fat in dry mass
de: Quark Rahmstufe, Quark 50% Fett i. Tr.
fr: Séré avec 50% de graisse en masse sèche, Quark avec 50% de graisse en masse sèche
hr: Kvark sa 50% masti u suhoj masi